Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2019
Retirement system; administration; Public Employees Retirement Board; duties; rules and regulations.

The general administration of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System, except the investment of funds, is hereby vested in the board. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act. The board shall employ an executive director and such assistants and employees as may be necessary to efficiently discharge the duties imposed by the act.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 6, p. 688;

Laws 1967, c. 391, § 4, p. 1216;

Laws 1967, c. 486, § 39, p. 1529;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-446;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 51;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 38;

Laws 1995, LB 369, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 35;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 36;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 38.
July 18, 2026